District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.142

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 112, 55 DCR 9251